Hawaii statutes.
§653-12 Certificate furnished garnishee.
After trial or hearing of the action, either in the original or any appellate
court, the party prevailing in the trial or hearing shall obtain from the court
in or before which the trial or hearing was had, a certificate, which shall
sufficiently describe the action to apprise the garnishee of its identity, and
shall state the nature of the judgment if any rendered therein, whether any
appeal from or exceptions to the judgment were noted at the time of rendering the
judgment, or whether the action had been voluntarily withdrawn or discontinued,
and the certificate shall be immediately furnished to the garnishee. [L 1890, c
50, §10; RL 1925, §2856; RL 1935, §4301; RL 1945, §10332; RL 1955, §238-12; HRS
§653-12]

Case Notes

Cited: 18 H. 593 (1908).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next